Virginia statutes. Title 27. Fire Protection.
Article 1. Provisions Applicable to Counties, Cities and Towns.
§ 27-23.5.
Exclusion of certain areas from fire zones or districts and exemption of such areas from certain levies.

The governing body of any city or county having a fire zone or district created under the provisions of §

27-23.1

, prior to June 1 of any calendar year, may alter the boundaries of such fire zone or district for the purpose of excluding an area of any such fire zone or district that is also within the boundaries of a sanitary district providing fire protection services or under contract to a sanitary district providing fire protection services.

Any area excluded from a fire zone or district as provided by this section shall not be subject to the levy set forth in §

27-23.1

for the year such area is excluded.

History.

1970, c. 187; 1985, c. 343; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire” throughout, and inserted “or emergency medical services” in the first paragraph, in two places.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “fire zone or district” for “fire/EMS district” throughout the section; and in the first paragraph, deleted “or emergency medical” preceding “services” twice, and made stylistic changes.

§ 27-23.6.
Repealed by Acts 2015, cc. 502 and 503, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

27-23.6

, pertaining to the provision of fire-fighting or emergency medical services, derived from 1970, c. 187; 1982, c. 239; 1991, c. 54; 2001, c. 142; 2002, c. 286.

§ 27-23.7.
Special levy for fire protection in certain counties.

Chapter 207 of the Acts of 1930, approved March 22, 1930 (codified as § 3144k of Michie Code of 1942), as amended, by Chapter 297 of the Acts of 1938, approved March 28, 1938, Chapter 392 of the Acts of 1940, approved April 1, 1940, Chapter 40 of the Acts of 1945, approved April 5, 1945, and Chapter 41 of the Acts of 1956, approved February 16, 1956, relating to special levy for fire protection in counties adjacent to a county containing more than 500 inhabitants a square mile, is continued in effect.

History.

1970, c. 187.

§ 27-23.8.
Trial board for members of fire departments in certain counties.

Chapter 8 of the Acts of 1950, approved February 9, 1950, as amended, by Chapter 409 of the Acts of 1954, approved April 3, 1954, relating to trial board for members of fire departments in any county having a population of more than 2,000 per square mile is incorporated in this Code by this reference.

History.

1970, c. 187.

§ 27-23.9.
Supervision and control of joint services of fire companies or departments.

Whenever two or more fire companies or fire departments are called to provide joint services in any district or political subdivision, the commander of the first company or department to arrive shall have general supervision and control of all such participating companies and departments until an officer of such district or political subdivision who is otherwise authorized by law to do so assumes such general supervision and control.

History.

1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “fire companies or fire” for “fire/EMS companies or”; inserted “or department” preceding “to arrive”; and substituted “assumes” for “shall assume” following “do so.”

§ 27-23.10.
Ordinances to effectuate purposes of § 27-23.9.

Every county, city and town is authorized to enact and enforce appropriate ordinances to effectuate the purposes of §

27-23.9

.

History.

1970, c. 187.